nb: Stempeltype for førstedagsbrev: Kunstnersignert illustrasjon; Preget illustrasjon; Håndtegnet illustrasjon; Håndmalt illustrasjon; Uten illustrasjon; Fotografisk illustrasjon; Trykt illustrasjon; Annet
hu: Első napi boríték (FDC) cachet típusa: Művész által szignált borítékrajz; Dombornyomott borítékrajz; Kézzel rajzolt borítékrajz; Kézzel festett borítékrajz; Borítékrajz nélkül; Fényképes borítékrajz; Nyomtatott borítékrajz; Egyéb
pt-PT: Tipo de carimbo do envelope de primeiro dia: Carimbo assinado pelo artista; Carimbo em relevo; Carimbo desenhado à mão; Carimbo pintado à mão; Sem carimbo; Carimbo fotográfico; Carimbo impresso; Outro
tr: İlk gün zarfı kaşe tipi: Sanatçı imzalı kaşe; Kabartmalı kaşe; Elde çizilmiş kaşe; Elde boyanmış kaşe; Kaşesiz; Fotoğrafik kaşe; Basılı kaşe; Diğer
it: Tipo di cachet della busta primo giorno di emissione: Cachet firmato dall’artista; Cachet in rilievo; Cachet disegnato a mano; Cachet dipinto a mano; Nessun cachet; Cachet fotografico; Cachet stampato; Altro
ko: 초일봉투 캐시 유형: 아티스트 서명 카셰; 엠보싱 카셰; 수제 드로잉 카셰; 수제 페인팅 카셰; 카셰 없음; 사진 카셰; 인쇄 카셰; 기타
hr-HR: Vrsta cachet otiska na prigodnoj omotnici prvog dana: Ukras s potpisom umjetnika; Reljefni ukras; Ručno crtani ukras; Ručno slikani ukras; Bez ukrasa; Fotografski ukras; Tiskani ukras; Ostalo
sl-SI: Vrsta priložnostnega žiga na ovitku za prvi dan: Žig s podpisom umetnika; Reliefni žig; Ročno narisan žig; Ročno poslikan žig; Brez žiga; Fotografski žig; Natisnjen žig; Drugo
pt-BR: Tipo de carimbo de envelope de primeiro dia: Carimbo assinado pelo artista; Carimbo em relevo; Carimbo desenhado à mão; Carimbo pintado à mão; Sem carimbo; Carimbo fotográfico; Carimbo impresso; Outros
ro-RO: Tip de ștampilă pentru plic de prima zi: Cașetă semnată de artist; Cașetă în relief; Cașetă desenată manual; Cașetă pictată manual; Fără cașetă; Cașetă fotografică; Cașetă tipărită; Altele
pl: Typ ilustracji koperty pierwszego dnia obiegu: Ilustracja z podpisem artysty; Ilustracja tłoczona; Ilustracja rysowana ręcznie; Ilustracja malowana ręcznie; Bez ilustracji; Ilustracja fotograficzna; Ilustracja drukowana; Inny
fr: Type de cachet pour enveloppe premier jour: Cachet signé par l’artiste; Cachet en relief; Cachet dessiné à la main; Cachet peint à la main; Sans cachet; Cachet photographique; Cachet imprimé; Autre
vi: Loại dấu kỷ niệm trên phong bì ngày đầu tiên phát hành: Hình minh họa có chữ ký nghệ sĩ; Hình minh họa dập nổi; Hình minh họa vẽ tay; Hình minh họa tô màu tay; Không có hình minh họa; Hình minh họa nhiếp ảnh; Hình minh họa in; Khác
es: Tipo de sello de autenticidad de sobre del primer día: Caché firmado por el artista; Caché en relieve; Caché dibujado a mano; Caché pintado a mano; Sin caché; Caché fotográfico; Caché impreso; Otro
cs: Typ razítka na obálce prvního dne: Přítisk podepsaný umělcem; Reliéfní přítisk; Ručně kreslený přítisk; Ručně malovaný přítisk; Bez přítisku; Fotografický přítisk; Tištěný přítisk; Jiné
de: Art des Ersttagsbrief-Stempels: Künstlersigniertes Cachet; Geprägtes Cachet; Handgezeichnetes Cachet; Handgemaltes Cachet; Ohne Cachet; Fotografisches Cachet; Gedrucktes Cachet; Sonstige
sv: Typ av förstadagastämpel: Konstnärssignerad cachet; Präglad cachet; Handritad cachet; Handmålad cachet; Ingen cachet; Fotografisk cachet; Tryckt cachet; Övrigt
ru: Тип кашета конверта первого дня: Каше, подписанное художником; Тисненое каше; Каше ручной рисовки; Каше, расписанное вручную; Без каше; Фотографическое каше; Печатное каше; Другое
lt-LT: Pirmosios dienos voko kašeto tipas: Menininko pasirašytas piešinys; Įspaustas piešinys; Rankomis pieštas piešinys; Rankomis tapytas piešinys; Be piešinio; Fotografinis piešinys; Spausdintas piešinys; Kita
ja: 初日カバー消印タイプ: アーティスト署名入りカシェ; エンボスカシェ; 手描きカシェ; 手塗りカシェ; カシェなし; 写真カシェ; 印刷カシェ; その他
th: ประเภทของตราประทับบนซองวันแรกจำหน่าย: ตราประทับลายเซ็นศิลปิน; ตราประทับนูน; ตราประทับวาดด้วยมือ; ตราประทับลงสีด้วยมือ; ไม่มีตราประทับ; ตราประทับรูปถ่าย; ตราประทับแบบพิมพ์; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Вид на печата на обложката на новоиздадени марки: Каше с подпис на художника; Релефно каше; Ръчно нарисувано каше; Ръчно оцветено каше; Без каше; Фотографско каше; Отпечатано каше; Друго
da: Stempeltype for førstedagsomslag: Kunstnersigneret cachet; Præget cachet; Håndtegnet cachet; Håndmalet cachet; Ingen cachet; Fotografisk cachet; Trykt cachet; Andet
el: Τύπος διακοσμητικής σήμανση) του φακέλου πρώτης ημέρας κυκλοφορίας: Εικονογράφηση (cachet) με υπογραφή καλλιτέχνη; Ανάγλυφη εικονογράφηση (cachet); Χειροποίητη εικονογράφηση (cachet); Ζωγραφισμένη στο χέρι εικονογράφηση (cachet); Χωρίς εικονογράφηση (cachet); Φωτογραφική εικονογράφηση (cachet); Εκτυπωμένη εικονογράφηση (cachet); Άλλο
fi: Ensipäiväkuoren kuvituksen tyyppi: Taiteilijan signeeraama lisäkuva; Kohokuvioitu lisäkuva; Käsin piirretty lisäkuva; Käsin maalattu lisäkuva; Ei lisäkuvaa; Valokuvallinen lisäkuva; Painettu lisäkuva; Muu
en: First day cover cachet type: Artist-signed cachet; Embossed cachet; Hand-drawn cachet; Hand-painted cachet; No cachet; Photographic cachet; Printed cachet; Other
sk-SK: Typ prítlače na obálke prvého dňa: Prítlač podpísaná umelcom; Reliéfna prítlač; Ručne kreslená prítlač; Ručne maľovaná prítlač; Bez prítlače; Fotografická prítlač; Tlačená prítlač; Iné
zh-CN: 首日封纪念戳类型: 艺术家签名图画; 压花图画; 手绘图画; 手工上色图画; 无图画; 摄影图画; 印刷图画; 其他
zh-TW: 首日封郵戳類型: 藝術家簽名紀念封; 浮雕紀念封; 手繪封圖; 手工上色封圖; 無封圖; 攝影封圖; 印刷封圖; 其他
nl: Type stempel eerste-dag-envelop: Cachet gesigneerd door kunstenaar; Cachet in reliëf; Handgetekend cachet; Handgeschilderd cachet; Geen cachet; Fotografisch cachet; Gedrukt cachet; Overige